arapaho.lexc
LEXICON NaffPerson2TA
@U.PERNUM.1S2S@:^é3   # ;
@U.PERNUM.1S2P@:^e3ébe   # ;
@U.PERNUM.2S1S@:^   # ;     !ask for Andy's confirmation for the alternation involved
@U.PERNUM.2P1S@:^íbe   # ;
@U.PERNUM.1P2S@:^eé   # ;
@U.PERNUM.1P2P@:^eebe   # ;
@U.PERNUM.2S1P@:^éi'ee   # ;
@U.PERNUM.2P1P@:^éi'éébe    # ;
@U.PERNUM.1S3S@:^oo    # ;
@U.PERNUM.1S3P@:^óóno'    # ;
@U.PERNUM.2S3S@:^oo    # ;
@U.PERNUM.2S3P@:^óóno'    # ;
@U.PERNUM.3S4@:^ee    # ;
@U.PERNUM.4S4@:^een    # ;
@U.PERNUM.1P3S@:^óóbe    # ;
@U.PERNUM.1P3P@:^óóbe    # ;
@U.PERNUM.123@:^oon    # ;
@U.PERNUM.2P3@:^óóbe    # ;
@U.PERNUM.3P4@:^eenó'    # ;
@U.PERNUM.4P4@:^eeníno    # ;
@U.PERNUM.3S1S@:^e'   # ;
@U.PERNUM.3P1S@:^e'   # ;
@U.PERNUM.3S2S@:^e'   # ;
@U.PERNUM.3P2S@:^e'   # ;
@U.PERNUM.43S@:^e'   # ;
@U.PERNUM.44S@:^e'   # ;
@U.PERNUM.3S1P@:^éíbe   # ;
@U.PERNUM.3P1P@:^éíbe   # ;
@U.PERNUM.312@:^éin    # ;
@U.PERNUM.32P@:^éíbe    # ;
@U.PERNUM.43P@:^ei'í    # ;
@U.PERNUM.44P@:^ei'í   # ;







LEXICON Aff
! for the affirmative order, direct each stem type to its appropriate inflection paradigm
@U.StemType.II@[II]:0     IIAff;
@U.StemType.AI@[AI]:0     AIAff;
@U.StemType.TI@[TI]:0     TIAff;
@U.StemType.TA@[TA]:0     TAAff;



!LEXICON Imp
! for the imperative order, direct each stem type to its appropriate inflection paradigm
!@U.StemType.II@:0     IIImp;
!@U.StemType.AI@:0     AIImp;
!@U.StemType.TI@:0     TIImp;
!@U.StemType.TA@:0     TAImp;


!LEXICON Conj
! for the conjunct order, direct each stem type to its appropriate inflection paradigm
!@U.StemType.II@:0     IIConj;
!@U.StemType.AI@:0     AIConj;
!@U.StemType.TI@:0     TIConj;
!@U.StemType.TA@:0     TAConj;


LEXICON IIAff
! narrow down even more. for Affirmative Order, II verb stem class, direct dor each tense.
! Present Affirmative undergoes Initial Change
@U.TAM.Present@:0     ICAff;
@U.TAM.Past@:0        IIAFFNUM;
@U.TAM.Future@:0        IIAFFNUM;


LEXICON AIAff
! narrow down even more. for Affirmative Order, II verb stem class, direct dor each tense.
! Present Affirmative undergoes Initial Change
@U.TAM.Present@:0         ICAff;
@U.TAM.Past@:0        AIAFFPERNUM;
@U.TAM.Future@:0        AIAFFPERNUM;


LEXICON TIAff
! narrow down even more. for Affirmative Order, II verb stem class, direct dor each tense.
! Present Affirmative undergoes Initial Change
@U.TAM.Present@:0    ICAff;
@U.TAM.Past@:0        TIAFFPERNUM;
@U.TAM.Future@:0        TIAFFPERNUM;


LEXICON TAAff
! narrow down even more. for Affirmative Order, II verb stem class, direct dor each tense.
! Present Affirmative undergoes Initial Change
@U.TAM.Present@:0    ICAff;
@U.TAM.Past@:0        TAAFFPERNUM;
@U.TAM.Future@:0        TAAFFPERNUM;


LEXICON ICAff
!flag IC forms. for each verb stem class, tag with perfect and progressive aspect (no morphological change involved) + IC tag
! then direct the tagged upper to the inflection paradigm of each stem type.
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.II@[PERFECT][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@0      IIAFFNUM;
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.II@[PROGRESSIVE][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@0      IIAFFNUM;
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.AI@[PERFECT][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@0          AIAFFPERNUM;
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.AI@[PROGRESSIVE][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@0      AIAFFPERNUM;
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TI@[PERFECT][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@0      TIAFFPERNUM;
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TI@[PROGRESSIVE][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@0      TIAFFPERNUM;
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TA@[PERFECT][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@0      TAAFFPERNUM;
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TA@[PROGRESSIVE][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@0      TAAFFPERNUM;


LEXICON IIAFFNUM
[3SG-SUBJ]:^'      # ;
[3PL-SUBJ]:^'i     # ;

LEXICON AIAFFPERNUM
[1SG-SUBJ]:^noo   # ;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][OLD_VERSION]:^ni'   # ;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ]:^'   # ;
[1PL-INCL-SUBJ]:^no'     # ;
[2SG-SUBJ]:^n     # ;
[2PL-SUBJ]:^nee   # ;
[4SG-SUBJ]:^ní3   # ;
[4PL-SUBJ]:^ní3i  # ;
@U.ExceptionAI.Yes@[IRREGULAR]:0    AIAFFPERNUMEXCEPTION ;
@U.ExceptionAI.No@:0     AIAFFPERNUMREGULAR ;

LEXICON AIAFFPERNUMREGULAR
[3SG-SUBJ]:^t     # ;
[3PL-SUBJ]:^3i'    # ;


LEXICON AIAFFPERNUMEXCEPTION
[3SG-SUBJ]:^'     # ;
[3PL-SUBJ]:^'i    # ;


! NUM of OBJ is inflected through reduplication (which is a type of derivation), which I'm not going to cover for now. 
! For [1PL-EXCL-SUBJ], some speakers drop final vowel(s) and consonant of the stem. Some don't. We only generate the one that doesn't drop it.

LEXICON TIAFFPERNUM
[1SG-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owoo   # ;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ][OLD_VERSION]:^owú'   # ;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owúni'   # ;
[1PL-INCL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owúno'     # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^ow     # ;
[2PL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owúnee   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^o'     # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^óú'u    # ;
[4SG-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owuní3   # ;
[4PL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owuní3i  # ;


LEXICON TAAFFPERNUM
@U.ActionType.Local@@U.Backward.No@[LocalAction]:@U.ActionType.Local@0     TAAffLocal;
@U.ActionType.Direct@@U.Backward.No@[DirectAction]:@U.ActionType.Direct@0     TAAffDirect;
@U.ActionType.Inverse@@U.Backward.No@[InverseAction]:@U.ActionType.Inverse@0     TAAffInverse;
@U.Backward.Yes@[BackwardDirectionOfAction]:@U.Backward.Yes@0          TAAffBackward;


LEXICON TAAffBackward
[1SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^ín   # ;
[1SG-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^ínee   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^é3en   # ;
[2PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^e3énee   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^éi'een   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^éi'éénee   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^een   # ;
[2PL-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^éénee   # ;
[1SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^éínoo   # ;
[1SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^í3i'   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^éín   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^éinóni   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^éít   # ;
[4SG-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^éiní3   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^éi'eet   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^éi'éé3i'   # ;
[1PL-INCL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^éíno'   # ;
[2PL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^éínee   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^éí3i'   # ;
[4PL-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^éiní3i   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^o'   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^ó'   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^óú'u   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^ót   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^óti   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^oot   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:^ooní3   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^eet   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^éé3i'   # ;
[3P-SUBJ][1PL-INCL-OBJ]:^óóno'   # ;
[3P-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^óónee   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^óó3i'   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:^ooní3i  # ;


LEXICON TAAffLocal
[1SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^é3en   # ;
[1SG-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^e3énee   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^ín   # ;
[2PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^ínee   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^een   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^éénee   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^éi'een   # ;
[2PL-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^éi'éénee   # ;


LEXICON TAAffDirect
[1SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^o'   # ;
[1SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^ó'   # ;
[1SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^óú'u   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^ót   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^óti   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^oot   # ;
[4SG-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^ooní3   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^eet   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^éé3i'   # ;
[1PL-INCL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^óóno'   # ;
[2PL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^óónee   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^óó3i'   # ;
[4PL-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^ooní3i   # ;


LEXICON TAAffInverse
[3SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^éínoo   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^í3i'   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^éín   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^éinóni   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^éít   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:^éiní3   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^éi'eet   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^éi'éé3i'   # ;
[3P-SUBJ][1PL-INCL-OBJ]:^éíno'   # ;
[3P-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^éínee   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^éí3i'   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:^éiní3i   # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Non-Affirmative Order !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!LEXICON IINaff
![1SG-SUBJ]:^    # ;
![1PL-SUBJ]:^no  # ;

!LEXICON AINaff
![1SG-SUBJ]:^    # ;
![1PL-SUBJ]:^    # ;
![1PL-INCL-SUBJ]:^   # ;
![2SG-SUBJ]:^    # ;
![2PL-SUBJ]:^    # ;
![3SG-SUBJ]:^    # ;
![3PL-SUBJ]:^    # ;
![4SG-SUBJ]:^    # ;
![4PL-SUBJ]:^    # ;
